District of Columbia statutes.
47-2846

Penalties.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter, or additions thereto made from time to time by the Council of the District of Columbia, where no specific penalty is fixed, or the violation of any regulation made by the Council under the authority of this chapter, shall upon conviction be fined not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or imprisoned for not more than 90 days. Any person failing to file any information required by this chapter, or by any regulation of the Council made under the provisions hereof, or who in filing any such information makes any false or misleading statement, shall upon conviction be fined not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or imprisoned for not more than 90 days. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this chapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 628, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 48
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 563, ch. 366
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 469(b), 32 DCR 4450
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 43(g), 35 DCR 147
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 28, 38 DCR 314
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 286(s), 60 DCR 2064
Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.
1981 Ed., § 47-2846.
1973 Ed., § 47-2347.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not more than $300” twice.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 286(s) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.